Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.040

Certificate of partnership—Publication.

The partnership cannot commence before the filing of the certificate of partnership, and if a false statement is made in the certificate, all the persons subscribing thereto are liable as general partners for all the debts of the partnership. The partners shall, for four consecutive weeks immediately after the filing of the certificate of partnership, publish a copy of it in some newspaper of general circulation in the county where the principal place of business of the partnership is, and until the publication is made and completed, the partnership is to be deemed general.

[ 1985 c 469 s 12; 1955 c 15 s 25.12.040. Prior: 1869 p 380 s 4; RRS s 9969.]